Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1112
Registrant; subject to personal jurisdiction.

Registering as a broker-dealer, issuer-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative under the Securities Act of Nebraska or directly or indirectly offering a security or investment adviser services in this state shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such a person in any action which arises under the act.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 12, p. 1790;

Laws 1973, LB 167, § 7;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 216, § 8.